Illinois, session 104th, HB4572.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 7-141 and 7-144 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/7-141)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-141)7    Sec. 7-141. Retirement annuities; conditions. Retirement 8annuities shall be payable as hereinafter set forth:9    (a) A participating employee who, regardless of cause, is 10separated from the service of all participating municipalities 11and instrumentalities thereof and participating 12instrumentalities shall be entitled to a retirement annuity 13provided:14        1. He is at least age 55 if he is a Tier 1 regular 15    employee, he is age 62 if he is a Tier 2 regular employee, 16    or, in the case of a person who is eligible to have his 17    annuity calculated under Section 7-142.1, he is at least 18    age 50;19        2. He is not entitled to receive earnings for 20    employment in a position requiring him, or entitling him 21    to elect, to be a participating employee;22        3. The amount of his annuity, before the application 23    of paragraph (b) of Section 7-142 is at least $10 per   HB4572- 2 -LRB104 16944 RPS 30358 b1    month;2        4. If he first became a participating employee after 3    December 31, 1961 and is a Tier 1 regular employee, he has 4    at least 8 years of service, or, if he is a Tier 2 regular 5    member, he has at least 10 years of service. This service 6    requirement shall not apply to any participating employee, 7    regardless of participation date, if the General Assembly 8    terminates the Fund.9    (a-5) If the retirement application of any annuitant under 10this Article must be retroactively denied because there was 11not a separation from service as required by subsection (a) of 12this Section, and the participating municipality or 13participating instrumentality that employs, re-employs, or 14contracts with that annuitant knowingly fails to notify the 15Board of such service, the Board may review the totality of 16circumstances regarding the member not having a separation of 17service and assign proportionate responsibility for 18reimbursement of the total of any annuity payments made to the 19annuitant in error, as determined by the Board, between the 20participating municipality or participating instrumentality 21and the annuitant, less any amount actually repaid by the 22annuitant. In no case shall the total amount repaid by the 23annuitant plus any amount reimbursed by the employer to the 24Fund be more than the total of all annuity payments made to the 25annuitant in error. 26    (b) Retirement annuities shall be payable:  HB4572- 3 -LRB104 16944 RPS 30358 b1        1. As provided in Section 7-119;2        2. Except as provided in item 3, upon receipt by the 3    fund of a written application. The effective date may be 4    not more than one year prior to the date of the receipt by 5    the fund of the application;6        3. Upon attainment of the required age of distribution 7    under Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code of 8    1986, as amended, if the member (i) is no longer in 9    service, and (ii) is otherwise entitled to an annuity 10    under this Article;11        4. To the beneficiary of the deceased annuitant for 12    the unpaid amount accrued to date of death, if any.13(Source: P.A. 102-210, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 7-30-21; 14102-210, Article 10, Section 10-5, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 155-13-22.) 16    (40 ILCS 5/7-144)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-144)17    Sec. 7-144. Retirement annuities; suspended during 18employment. 19    (a) If any person receiving any annuity again becomes an 20employee and receives earnings from employment in a position 21requiring him, or entitling him to elect, to become a 22participating employee, then the annuity payable to such 23employee shall be suspended as of the first day of the month 24coincidental with or next following the date upon which such 25person becomes such an employee, unless the person is   HB4572- 4 -LRB104 16944 RPS 30358 b1authorized under subsection (b) of Section 7-137.1 of this 2Code to continue receiving a retirement annuity during that 3period. Upon proper qualification of the participating 4employee payment of such annuity may be resumed on the first 5day of the month following such qualification and upon proper 6application therefor. The participating employee in such case 7shall be entitled to a supplemental annuity arising from 8service and credits earned subsequent to such re-entry as a 9participating employee.10    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, an 11annuitant shall be considered a participating employee if he 12or she returns to work as an employee with a participating 13employer and works more than 599 hours annually (or 999 hours 14annually with a participating employer that has adopted a 15resolution pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 7-137 of this 16Code). Each of these annual periods shall commence on the 17month and day upon which the annuitant is first employed with 18the participating employer following the effective date of the 19annuity. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, an 21annuitant receiving an annuity under Section 7-142.1 shall be 22considered a participating employee if the annuitant returns 23to work as a school security guard employed by a participating 24employer and works more than 999 hours annually. 25    (a-5) If any annuitant under this Article must be 26considered a participating employee per the provisions of   HB4572- 5 -LRB104 16944 RPS 30358 b1subsection (a) of this Section, and the participating 2municipality or participating instrumentality that employs or 3re-employs that annuitant knowingly fails to notify the Board 4that the annuitant has returned to a qualifying position, the 5Board may review the totality of circumstances of the return 6to work and assign proportionate responsibility for 7reimbursement of the total of any annuity payments made to the 8annuitant after the date the annuity should have been 9suspended, as determined by the Board, between to suspend the 10annuity, the participating municipality or participating 11instrumentality and the annuitant, less any amount actually 12repaid by the annuitant may be required to reimburse the Fund 13for an amount up to one-half of the total of any annuity 14payments made to the annuitant after the date the annuity 15should have been suspended, as determined by the Board. In no 16case shall the total amount repaid by the annuitant plus any 17amount reimbursed by the employer to the Fund be more than the 18total of all annuity payments made to the annuitant after the 19date the annuity should have been suspended. This subsection 20shall not apply if the annuitant returned to work for the 21employer for less than 12 months.22    The Fund shall notify all annuitants that they must notify 23the Fund immediately if they return to work for any 24participating employer. The notification by the Fund shall 25occur upon retirement and no less than annually thereafter in 26a format determined by the Fund. The Fund shall also develop   HB4572- 6 -LRB104 16944 RPS 30358 b1and maintain a system to track annuitants who have returned to 2work and notify the participating employer and annuitant at 3least annually of the limitations on returning to work under 4this Section.5    (b) Supplemental annuities to persons who return to 6service for less than 48 months shall be computed under the 7provisions of Sections 7-141, 7-142, and 7-143. In determining 8whether an employee is eligible for an annuity which requires 9a minimum period of service, his entire period of service 10shall be taken into consideration but the supplemental annuity 11shall be based on earnings and service in the supplemental 12period only. The effective date of the suspended and 13supplemental annuity for the purpose of increases after 14retirement shall be considered to be the effective date of the 15suspended annuity.16    (c) Supplemental annuities to persons who return to 17service for 48 months or more shall be a monthly amount 18determined as follows:19        (1) An amount shall be computed under subparagraph b 20    of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 7-142, 21    considering all of the service credits of the employee.22        (2) The actuarial value in monthly payments for life 23    of the annuity payments made before suspension shall be 24    determined and subtracted from the amount determined in 25    paragraph (1) above.26        (3) The monthly amount of the suspended annuity, with   HB4572- 7 -LRB104 16944 RPS 30358 b1    any applicable increases after retirement computed from 2    the effective date to the date of reinstatement, shall be 3    subtracted from the amount determined in paragraph (2) 4    above and the remainder shall be the amount of the 5    supplemental annuity provided that this amount shall not 6    be less than the amount computed under subsection (b) of 7    this Section.8        (4) The suspended annuity shall be reinstated at an 9    amount including any increases after retirement from the 10    effective date to date of reinstatement.11        (5) The effective date of the combined suspended and 12    supplemental annuities for the purposes of increases after 13    retirement shall be considered to be the effective date of 14    the supplemental annuity.15    (d) If a Tier 2 regular employee becomes a member or 16participant under any other system or fund created by this 17Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for those 18members or participants exempted from the provisions of 19subsection (a) of Section 1-160 of this Code (other than a 20participating employee under this Article), then the person's 21retirement annuity shall be suspended during that employment. 22Upon termination of that employment, the person's retirement 23annuity shall resume and be recalculated as required by this 24Section. 25    (e) If a Tier 2 regular employee first began participation 26on or after January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement   HB4572- 8 -LRB104 16944 RPS 30358 b1annuity and accepts on a contractual basis a position to 2provide services to a governmental entity from which he or she 3has retired, then that person's annuity or retirement pension 4shall be suspended during that contractual service, 5notwithstanding the provisions of any other Section in this 6Article. Such annuitant shall notify the Fund, as well as his 7or her contractual employer, of his or her retirement status 8before accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to 9submit such notification shall be guilty of a Class A 10misdemeanor and required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon 11termination of that contractual employment, the person's 12retirement annuity shall resume and be recalculated as 13required by this Section. 14(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 104-163, eff. 8-15-25.) 15    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 16Section 8.50 as follows: 17    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)18    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 198 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 20the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 21Act of the 104th General Assembly.